Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Oregon Military Department, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for  the following
purposes:
(1) Administration..........................  $ 10,685,606
(2) Operations.................................  $ 16,171,486
(3) Community support ..................  $ 1,504,645
(4) Debt service ..............................  $ 12,781,890
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and re-
imbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds
not described in this section, collected or received by the Oregon Military Department,  for
the following purposes:
(1) Administration.......................... $ 3,496,716
(2) Operations................................. $ 6,338,590
(3) Community support .................. $ 10,727,971
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from federal funds, other than those described  in section 2 of this 2023 Act,
collected or received by the Oregon Military Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $119,723,418
(2) Community support .................. $ 18,711,800
(3) Capital improvement................. $ 5,578,971
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (2), chapter 662, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and  reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
662, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by the Oregon Military Department,  for oper-
ations, is increased by $1,000,000 for federal reimbursements.
Enrolled House Bill 5031 (HB 5031-A) Page 1
SECTION 5. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by House June 1, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 24, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5031 (HB 5031-A) Page 2